Massachusetts, session 194th, H2602.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 33 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 43 the 
following section:- 
Section 43A. (a) The Adjunct General of the Massachusetts National Guard, or their 
designee, shall provide written notice to members of the house of representatives and the senate 
of an order activating the organized militia (Massachusetts National Guard), when such militia is 
deployed in any such member’s district pursuant to this chapter. 
(b) The notice provided for in subsection (a) shall be in advance of such deployment and 
include specific reasons for activating the organized militia including, but not limited to: (i) 
whether said order was in response to a request for support by a municipal or county official or 

of 2 10 any other person; (ii) the municipality or municipalities wherein the organized militia shall be 
deployed; (iii) what event or occurrence has prompted said order; and (iv) any other information 
necessary to determine the scope and purpose of said activation.